Florida, session 2026, SB352.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 320.60, Florida 10 Statutes, is amended to read: 11 320.60âDefinitions for ss. 320.61-320.70.âWhenever used in 12 ss. 320.61-320.70, unless the context otherwise requires, the 13 following words and terms have the following meanings: 14 (2)(a)ââCommon entityâ means a person: 15 1.âWho is directly or indirectly controlled by or has more 16 than 30 percent of its equity interest directly or indirectly 17 owned, beneficially or of record, through any form of ownership 18 structure, by a manufacturer, an importer, a distributor, or a 19 licensee, or an affiliate thereof; or 20 2.âWho has more than 30 percent of its equity interest 21 directly or indirectly controlled or owned, beneficially or of 22 record, through any form of ownership structure, by one or more 23 persons who also directly or indirectly control or own, 24 beneficially or of record, more than 30 percent of the equity 25 interests of a manufacturer, an importer, a distributor, or a 26 licensee, or an affiliate thereof. 27 (b)âNotwithstanding subparagraph (a)1. or subparagraph 28 (a)2., an entity that would otherwise be considered a common 29 entity of a distributor or a manufacturer under subparagraph 30 (a)1. or subparagraph (a)2. because of its relation to a 31 distributor or a manufacturer is not considered a common entity 32 of that distributor or manufacturer if: 33 1.a.âThe distributor to which the entity is related was a 34 licensed distributor on March 1, 2023; 35 b.2.âThe entity is not a common entity of a manufacturer or 36 an importer; and 37 c.3.âThe distributor to which the entity is related is not, 38 and has never been, a common entity of a manufacturer or an 39 importer; or 40 2.âThe entity was incorporated in the United States and 41 solely manufactures or assembles vehicles that are part of a 42 motor vehicle line-make that has no franchised motor vehicle 43 dealers in this state. 44 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.